Colorado, session 2026A, HB1273.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-4-127, amend
(1)(a), (9) introductory portion, (9)(d)(I)(J), (9)(d)(II), (10) introductory
portion, and (13)(c); and add (1)(a.5), (1)(c.5), (1)(o.3), (1)(o.5), (1)(o.7),
and (12.5) as follows:
8-4-127. Transportation network companies - disclosures to
drivers - deactivation and suspension policies - disclosures to division
- amount of consumer fare kept by a transportation network
company - definitions - enforcement - rules - legislative declaration.
(1) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(a) "Available platform time" means the period when a driver is
active on a transportation network company's digital platform while
awaiting a transportation services request to come through the digital
platform. (I) "AIRPORT FEES" MAY INCLUDE AN AMOUNT THAT A TNC IS
REQUIRED TO PAY TO AN AIRPORT OR OTHER THIRD PARTY IN CONNECTION
WITH A PICKUP OR DROP-OFF OF ONE OR MORE RIDERS AT AN AIRPORT.
(II) "AIRPORT FEES" DOES NOT INCLUDE AN AMOUNT THAT A TNC
DOES NOT ACTUALLY PAY TO THE AIRPORT OR OTHER THIRD PARTY.
(a.5) "AVAILABLE PLATFORM TIME" MEANS THE PERIOD WHEN A
DRIVER IS ACTIVE ON A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S DIGITAL
PLATFORM WHILE AWAITING A TRANSPORTATION SERVICES REQUEST TO
-2- 1273

COME THROUGH THE DIGITAL PLATFORM.
(c.5) "CONSUMER FARE" MEANS THE AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT A
CONSUMER PAYS FOR A TRANSPORTATION TASK, EXCLUDING:
(I) TIPS;
(II) PASS-THROUGHS;
(III) TAXES;
(IV) AIRPORT FEES; AND
(V) PAYMENTS FOR A DRIVER SUPPORT ORGANIZATION CERTIFIED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION.
(o.3) "TAKE AMOUNT":
(I) MEANS THE PORTION OF A CONSUMER FARE THAT A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY, AFTER MAKING PAYMENT TO A
DRIVER, RETAINS FOR ITSELF;
(II) INCLUDES ANY AMOUNT OF MONEY RETAINED BY A TNC FOR
THE PURPOSE OF PAYING FEES, OTHER THAN AIRPORT FEES LISTED IN
SUBSECTION (1)(c.5) OF THIS SECTION; CHARGES; OR OTHER COSTS THAT
THE TNC IS REQUIRED TO PAY IN CONNECTION WITH THE TRANSACTION OR
FOR THE GENERAL OPERATIONAL COSTS OF THE TNC; AND
(III) DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY AMOUNT OF THE CONSUMER FARE
THAT THE TNC PAYS TO THE DRIVER.
(o.5) "TAKE RATE" MEANS THE PERCENTAGE OF A CONSUMER FARE
THAT IS A TAKE AMOUNT.
(o.7) (I) "TAXES" MAY INCLUDE AN AMOUNT THAT A TNC IS
REQUIRED TO PAY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT.
(II) "TAXES" DOES NOT INCLUDE AN AMOUNT THAT A TNC DOES
NOT ACTUALLY PAY TO A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR THE
-3- 1273

FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.
(9) Annual disclosures to the division. On August 1, 2026, and
on a semiannual AN ANNUAL basis thereafter, a transportation network
company shall make the following disclosures to the division:
(d) (I) For a sample size of one thousandth of the transportation
tasks for which a TNC dispatches a driver, or an amount less as
authorized by the director by rule, and pursuant to a representative and
reproducible sampling methodology determined and designed by the
director and in consultation with the TNCs:
(J) The total amount that the consumer paid for the transportation
task, disaggregated to show the amount of any tip, AIRPORT FEE,
PASS-THROUGH, TAXES, PAYMENTS FOR A DRIVER SUPPORT ORGANIZATION
CERTIFIED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION, TAKE RATE,
AND TAKE AMOUNT; and
(II) To ensure the reliability of a TNC's sampling process used
pursuant to this subsection (9)(d) and the TNC's compliance with the
sampling process, the director may audit the TNC's sampling process by
requiring the TNC to provide the director the total number of dispatched
transportation tasks made during the relevant semiannual ANNUAL period.
(10) Public availability of TNC annual disclosures. The
information that a transportation network company provides through
semiannual ANNUAL disclosures in accordance with subsection (9) of this
section to the division is a public record, as defined in section 24-72-202
(6). Prior to any disclosure of the information pursuant to the "Colorado
Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, the division shall:
(12.5) Amount of consumer fare kept by a transportation
network company - legislative declaration.
-4- 1273

(a) (I) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(A) TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES AND DRIVERS PLAY
AN IMPORTANT ROLE IN COLORADO'S PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
INFRASTRUCTURE; YET, TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES HAVE
NOT BEEN MADE SUBJECT TO PUBLIC RATE SETTING, ACCESSIBILITY
REQUIREMENTS, OR OTHER REGULATIONS THAT APPLY TO COMMON
CARRIERS OR OTHER PUBLIC UTILITIES;
(B) TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES MAINTAIN THAT THEY
ARE NOT SUBJECT TO EMPLOYMENT LAWS WITH RESPECT TO DRIVERS,
WHICH LAWS WOULD ENSURE THEIR DRIVERS EARN AT LEAST A MINIMUM
WAGE;
(C) TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES INSTEAD SET WAGES
THROUGH HIDDEN ALGORITHMS BASED ON FACTORS THAT ARE NOT
DISCLOSED TO DRIVERS AND WHICH MAY BE USED IN A MANNER THAT
MANIPULATES DRIVER BEHAVIOR;
(D) MEANWHILE, DRIVER WAGES FALL FAR BELOW OUR STATE
MINIMUM WAGE STANDARDS, PARTICULARLY GIVEN THE SUBSTANTIAL
COSTS THAT DRIVERS INCUR IN ORDER TO DO THEIR JOBS;
(E) WHILE CONSUMER FARES APPEAR TO BE INCREASING, DRIVER
PAY IS NOT, AND, THEREFORE, THE TAKE AMOUNT RETAINED BY A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY IS INCREASING;
(F) THE TAKE AMOUNT RETAINED BY A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY HAS BECOME EXTRAORDINARY, WITH ANECDOTAL
REPORTS OF TAKE AMOUNTS OF SIXTY PERCENT AND EVEN SEVENTY
PERCENT OF THE CONSUMER FARE IN SOME CASES; AND
(G) HIGH TAKE RATES GENERATE FRICTION BETWEEN CONSUMERS
AND DRIVERS, MOVE PROFITS AWAY FROM COLORADO DRIVERS TO
-5- 1273

OUT-OF-STATE BUSINESSES, FACILITATE PRICE GOUGING OF CONSUMERS,
AND ALLOW MANIPULATION OF DRIVERS. PROTECTION AGAINST
INCREASING TAKE RATES IS NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT CONSUMERS AND
DRIVERS ARE TREATED FAIRLY.
(II) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER DECLARES
THAT:
(A) THIS SUBSECTION (12.5) PROHIBITS TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANIES FROM RAISING TAKE RATES ABOVE TWENTY
PERCENT AS A MEANS TO PREVENT PRICE GOUGING, WHICH PRICE GOUGING
INCREASES CORPORATE PROFITS AT THE EXPENSE OF COLORADO DRIVERS
AND CONSUMERS; AND
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THIS
SUBSECTION (12.5) BE BROADLY INTERPRETED TO ACHIEVE ITS INTENDED
PURPOSES.
(b) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL NOT CHARGE
AN AMOUNT IN EXCESS OF TWENTY PERCENT AS A TAKE RATE FOR ANY
TRANSPORTATION TASK.
(c) A TNC SHALL PAY A DRIVER AT LEAST EIGHTY PERCENT OF THE
CONSUMER FARE PAID FOR A TRANSPORTATION TASK.
(d) THE AMOUNT THAT A TNC EXCLUDES FROM A CONSUMER FARE
PAYMENT INTENDED AS PAYMENT FOR THE CERTIFIED DRIVER SUPPORT
ORGANIZATION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(c.5)(V) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) MUST NOT EXCEED THE PER-TASK AMOUNT ESTABLISHED BY
THE DIRECTOR BY RULE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(c) OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(II) SHALL BE REMITTED TO THE CERTIFIED DRIVER SUPPORT
ORGANIZATION.
-6- 1273

(e) A TNC SHALL PAY ALL PASS-THROUGHS IN FULL TO THE
DRIVER.
(f) A TNC SHALL NOT IMPOSE A FEE ON A DRIVER FOR A
TRANSPORTATION TASK UNLESS THE TAKE AMOUNT FOR THE
TRANSPORTATION TASK PLUS THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE, EXPRESSED AS A
PERCENTAGE, DOES NOT EXCEED TWENTY PERCENT OF THE CONSUMER
FARE PAID FOR THE TRANSPORTATION TASK.
(13) Penalties, fines, and enforcement.
(c) The director shall establish procedures for drivers and
consumers to submit complaints to the division and for the division's
investigations, hearings, and imposition of fines pursuant to this
subsection (13). AN APPEAL ASSOCIATED WITH A DIVISION
DETERMINATION OF RIGHTS AND REMEDIES UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
ADJUDICATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 8-4-111.5.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-4-111.5, amend (1)
as follows:
8-4-111.5. Hearing officer review and appeals of
administrative actions.
(1) Pursuant to policies established by the director by rule, any
interested party who is dissatisfied with the division's decision on a wage
complaint filed pursuant to section 8-4-111 (2) OR ON A COMPLAINT FILED
AGAINST A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY PURSUANT TO SECTION
8-4-127 may file a request for a hearing within thirty-five days after the
division's decision is sent. If no A request is NOT filed within the
thirty-five-day period, the division's decision is final.
SECTION 3. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
-7- 1273

act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of
labor and employment for use by the division of labor standards and
statistics for program costs related to labor standards is decreased by
$16,343, and the related FTE is decreased by 0.1 FTE.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of
an appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27
state fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the
annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the
department of labor and employment for use by the division of labor
standards and statistics for program costs related to labor standards is less
than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year does not include an appropriation to the department of labor
and employment for use by the division of labor standards and statistics
for program costs related to labor standards.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
-8- 1273

date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the
annual general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever
is later.
(3) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-9- 1273